Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 12 Industrial Development and Siting

Revision of chapter. —

Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2, revised this chapter by repealing and recreating former §§

35-12-101

through 35-12-121 as present §§

35-12-101

through

35-12-119

.

Section

35-12-104

was also amended by Laws 175, § 1.

No detailed explanation of the changes made by Laws 1987, ch. 82 has been attempted, but, where appropriate, annotations to cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statues Annotated.

Purpose of chapter. —

The pervasive regulatory scheme of this chapter was enacted to protect Wyoming's environment and the social and economic fabric of the communities affected by industrial development. Industrial Sitting Council v. Chicago & N. W. Transp. Co., 660 P.2d 776,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1983).

This chapter provides especially for public participation

in the decisions on projects such as the Laramie river station. Indeed, a purpose of establishing the industrial siting council was to receive from and disseminate to Wyoming citizens information upon which future industrial growth can be intelligently developed. Laramie River Conservation Council v. Dinger, 567 P.2d 731,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1977).

Supremacy of federal law in regulation of interstate railroad lines. —

Regulation of the construction, extension and operation of interstate railroad lines by this chapter is preempted by the federal Interstate Commerce Act under the supremacy clause of the U.S. Const., art. VI. Industrial Siting Council v. Chicago & N.W. Transp. Co., 660 P.2d 776,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Industrial Siting Legislation: The Wyoming Industrial Development Information and Siting Act — Advance or Retreat?” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 27 (1976).

For case note, “The Scope of Judicial Review of Administrative Actions, Laramie River Conservation Council v. Industrial Siting Council, 588 P.2d 1241,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 607 (1979).

For article, “Regulating Socioeconomic Impacts: Comparing the Colorado and Wyoming Approaches,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 193 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of local regulation of hazardous waste, 67 ALR4th 822.

Application of § 165 of Clean Air Act (42 USC § 7475), pertaining to preconstruction requirements for prevention of significant deterioration, to particular emission sources, 86 ALR Fed 255.

39A C.J.S. Health and Environment § 132.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
174.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 35-12-101.
Short title.

This chapter is the “Industrial Development Information and Siting Act”.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.75; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2.

§ 35-12-102.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Advisory member” means an advisory member of the council provided by W.S. 35-12-104(f);

“Applicant” means any person who applies for a permit pursuant to this chapter;

“Commence to construct” means:

Any clearing of land, excavation, construction or other action that would affect the environment of the site of any facility, but does not include changes needed for temporary use of sites for less than ninety (90) days, changes required to conduct required studies and tests under this chapter, or any other state or federal act or regulation, or access roads and services associated with utilities, or routes for nonutility purposes or for uses in securing geological data but not limited to necessary borings or drillings to ascertain foundation conditions;

The nuclear fracturing of underground formation, if any such activity is related to the possible future development of a facility subject to this chapter, but does not include the gathering of geological data by boring of test holes or other underground exploration, investigation or experimentation.

“Council” means the industrial siting council;

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental quality;

“Impacted area” means an area of Wyoming in which sudden or prolonged population growth may occur or may cause environmental, social or economic stresses of such nature that the total local, state and federal resources available are not sufficient to alleviate them properly and effectively as determined by the council;

“Industrial facility” or “facility” means any industrial facility with an estimated construction cost of at least ninety-six million nine hundred thousand dollars ($96,900,000.00) as of May 30, 1987. Exempt activities shall not be included in the estimated construction cost of an industrial facility. The council shall adjust this amount, up or down, each year using recognized construction cost indices as the council determines to be relevant to the actual change in construction cost applicable to the general type of construction covered under this chapter. “Facility” also includes, regardless of construction cost:

Any commercial waste incineration or disposal facility capable of receiving greater than five hundred (500) short tons per day of household refuse or mixed household and industrial refuse, excluding lands and facilities subject to W.S. 35-11-402(a)(xiii);

Any commercial facility which incinerates or disposes of any regulated quantity of hazardous wastes which are subject to hazardous waste shipping manifest requirements under subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (42 U.S.C. §§ 6921 through 6939e);

Any commercial radioactive waste management facility defined by W.S.

35-11-103

(d)(v);

Until July 1, 1999, any facility constructed solely for the disposal of overburden, development waste rock or refuse from mining as defined under W.S.

35-11-103

, except for the following facilities:

Facilities permitted or licensed under article 4 of the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act;

Facilities specifically exempt from permitting requirements under article 4 of the Wyoming Environmental Quality Act;

Facilities specifically identified under W.S. 35-11-103(d)(v)(A).

Any commercial facility generating electricity from wind and associated collector systems that:

Consists of twenty (20) or more wind turbines in all planned phases of the installation; or

Expand an existing installation not previously defined as a facility to include a total number of turbines greater than or equal to the thresholds in subdivision (a)(vii)(E)(I) of this section.

Any facility over which a board of county commissioners has authority to issue the permit required by W.S.

18-5-502

and which facility the board of county commissioners has referred to the council under W.S.

18-5-509

;

Any commercial facility generating electricity from solar power and associated solar collector systems if the facility:

Has a rated power capacity of more than thirty (30) megawatts;

Would result in a surface disturbance equal to or greater than one hundred (100) acres; or

Is expanded to where the facility would satisfy subdivision (I) or (II) of this subparagraph.

Any facility that would meet the definition of subparagraphs (E) or (G) of this paragraph but is planned for construction and siting or has its ownership or business structure organized in a way to circumvent the definition of “industrial facility” or “facility” or the requirements of this chapter while engaging in conduct that otherwise would be subject to the requirements of this article. A facility that meets the definition of this chapter shall comply with all requirements applicable to facilities defined by subparagraphs (E) and (G) of this paragraph.

“Local government” means any county, city, town or school district or any combination thereof as formed under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act;

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 4.

“Permit” means the permit issued by the council and required for the construction or operation of any industrial facility or facilities;

“Person” includes an individual, group, firm, partnership, corporation, cooperative, association, or other entity excluding the state, federal government and local government. “Person” also includes the parent company, partnership or holding entity for a commercial facility generating electricity from wind or solar;

“Administrator” means the administrator of the division;

“Division” means the industrial siting division of the department of environmental quality;

“Collector system” means the electrical transmission infrastructure, including conductors, towers, substations, switchgear and other components necessary to deliver power from any commercial facility generating electricity from wind or solar up to, but not including, electric substations or similar facilities necessary to interconnect to existing or proposed transmission lines that serve load or export energy from Wyoming;

“Affected landowner” means any person holding record title to land on which any portion of a commercial facility generating electricity from wind or solar is proposed to be constructed and including any portion of any collector system located on those same lands. For purposes of this chapter, an affected landowner may be represented by any designated person.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.76; Laws 1981, ch. 127, § 1; 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1989, ch. 180, § 1; 1992, ch. 60, §§ 3, 4; ch. 88, § 1; 1996, ch. 60, § 1; 2010, ch. 47, § 1; ch. 97 § 2; 2011, ch. 146, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 143, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 47, § 1, in (a), added (a)(vii)(E), inserted the present last sentence in (a)(xi), added (a)(xiv); and made a related change.

The second 2010 amendment, by ch. 97, § 2, effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(vii)(F) and made related change.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(xv).

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(vii)(E)(I) substituted “thirty (30)” for “twenty (20)”; added (a)(vii)(G) and (a)(vii)(H); in (a)(xi), (a)(xiv), and (a)(xv) substituted “from wind or solar” for “from wind.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 143, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(vii)(A) added “excluding lands and facilities subject to W.S. 35-11-402(a)(xiii)” at the end.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Joint Powers Act. —

See §§

16-1-102

and 16-1-103(a)(ii).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 35-12-103.
Creation of industrial siting division.

There is created within the department of environmental quality the industrial siting division.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.77; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3.

§ 35-12-104.
Industrial siting council created; composition; terms; removal; compensation.

There is created the industrial siting council consisting of seven (7) members who are residents of Wyoming.

The terms of council members shall be six (6) years, except that on the initial appointment three (3) members shall serve for six (6) years, two (2) members shall serve for four (4) years and two (2) members shall serve two (2) years as designated by the initial appointment.

Members shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. If a vacancy occurs the governor shall appoint a new member as provided in W.S.

28-12-101

. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the members shall be of the same political party.

The council, annually, shall elect a chairman, vice-chairman and secretary from among its members. The council shall have at least four (4) regularly scheduled meetings each year and may meet at the call of the chairman or upon request of a majority of the members at other times. For the purpose of conducting council business four (4) members constitute a quorum but no action taken is valid unless approved by at least four (4) members.

Council members appointed pursuant to this section shall be reimbursed for per diem, mileage and expenses and receive salary for attending meetings and hearings of the council in the same manner and amount as members of the Wyoming legislature.

The administrative head of each state agency enumerated in W.S. 35-12-110(b), or the designated representative, may attend meetings of the council and serve in an advisory capacity to facilitate and expedite the decision making process of the council. The council may request any administrative head to pursue, evaluate and submit reports relative to any study which may be required in the evaluation of an application for a permit.

Appointments and terms under this chapter shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.78; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 82, § 2; ch. 175, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to compensation, per diem and travel expenses of members of the legislature, see §§

28-5-101

and

28-5-102

.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%) of the” for “four (4)” in (c).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2, states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

§ 35-12-105.
Appointment and duties of administrator; staff; rules and regulations.

The director shall appoint an administrator of the division who shall serve at the director’s pleasure as the executive and administrative head of the division. The administrator is responsible to and under control and supervision of the director. The director shall employ such other staff as deemed necessary by the director to carry out the functions and responsibilities of the division.

The council shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, implementing this chapter. The director, or the administrator if designated by the director, shall administer and enforce this chapter and any rules, regulations and orders approved or issued by the council.

The director, administrator and the staff of the division are authorized to the extent possible, at the request of local governments, to provide technical assistance to local governments in the preparation of anticipated impacts related to a proposed project consistent with W.S. 39-15-111(c) and (d) and 39-16-111(d) and (e) and negotiation of agreements with applicants as provided for in W.S.

35-12-107

.

In addition to the rules and regulations adopted under subsection (b) of this section, the council shall promulgate rules and regulations prescribing decommissioning and site reclamation standards for facilities permitted under W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) and (G). Such standards shall preempt county rules or regulations concerning decommissioning and reclamation and shall be designed to assure the proper decommissioning and interim and final site reclamation of commercial facilities generating electricity from wind or solar and wind energy and solar energy facilities during construction and operation of the facility, at the end of their useful life, upon revocation of a permit authorizing their operation or upon the happening of any event which causes operations to cease. The council’s regulation shall only preempt those facilities regulated under this act. In the event of any conflict between a standard applied under this subsection and a valid order of the Wyoming public service commission, the order of the public service commission shall be applied.

In addition to the rules and regulations adopted under subsection (b) of this section, the council shall promulgate rules and regulations prescribing financial assurance requirements for facilities permitted by it pursuant to W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) and (G). These rules and regulations shall not apply to facilities that are public utilities and regulated by the Wyoming public service commission. These rules and regulations shall preempt county rules and regulations concerning financial assurances and shall be designed to provide adequate assurance that the permitted facilities will be properly reclaimed and decommissioned at the end of their useful life, upon revocation of a permit authorizing their operation or upon the happening of any event which causes operations to cease. The elements to consider when establishing adequate levels of financial assurance shall include credit worthiness, financial strength, credit history, credit rating and any other factors that reasonably bear upon the decision to accept a financial assurance. The financial assurance may be in any form acceptable to the council and may include a corporate guarantee, letter of credit, bond, deposit account or insurance policy.

In addition to the rules and regulations adopted under subsection (b) of this section, the council shall promulgate rules and regulations requiring applicants for facilities described in W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) and (G) to provide notice to record owners of mineral rights located on or under the lands where the proposed facility will be constructed. Such notice may include notice by publication.

The council may adopt such rules and regulations, including fee structures, as are appropriate to accept and consider applications referred by any board of county commissioners under W.S.

18-5-509

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.79; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2010, ch. 47, § 3; ch. 97, § 3; 2015 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment by ch. 47, § 3, added (d) through (f).

Laws 2010, ch. 47, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.

The second 2010 amendment by ch. 97, § 3, effective July 1, 2010, added (d), (e) and (g).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (c), inserted “preparation of anticipated impacts related to a proposed project consistent with W.S. 39-15-111(c) and (d) and 39-16-111(d) and (e) and,” and deleted “and 35-12-113(a)(vi)” at the end.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (d) through (f) substituted “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) and (G)” for “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) and (F)”; and in (d) substituted “from wind or solar and wind energy and solar energy facilities” for “from wind and wind energy facilities.”

Editor's notes. —

In subsection (d) the sentence “The council's regulation shall only preempt those facilities regulated under this act.” became effective July 1, 2010.
See 2010 Wyoming Session Laws Chapter 97, § 3(a).

The reference to § 35-12-113(a)(vi) in subsection (c) seems incorrect, as that section does not contain a subsection (a)(vi).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2010, ch. 47, § 4, provides: “There is appropriated three hundred fifty-five thousand seven hundred fifty-four dollars ($355,754.00) from the general fund and one (1) full-time position is authorized to the department of environmental quality. This appropriation shall be for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purposes of this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2012. This appropriation shall be included in the department's 2013-2014 standard biennial budget request.”

§ 35-12-106.
Permit from council required before commencing construction of facility; electronic permitting; amendments; exceptions; federal requirements.

No person shall commence to construct a facility, as defined in this chapter, in this state without first obtaining a permit for that facility from the council. Any facility, for which a permit is required, shall be constructed, operated and maintained in conformity with the permit and any terms, conditions and modifications contained in the permit. A permit may only be issued pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

18-5-501

through

18-5-513

for facilities referred to the council.

A permit may be transferred, subject to council approval, to a person who agrees to comply with the terms, conditions and modifications contained in the permit.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the council may allow the amendment of a permit or application for a permit for good cause if the holder demonstrates to the council at its next meeting that the requested change is in compliance with local ordinances and applicable land use plans and will not significantly add to adverse environmental, social and economic impact in the impacted area.

On an application for an amendment of a permit, the council shall hold a hearing in the same manner as a hearing is held on an application for a permit if in the council’s opinion the requested change in the facility would result in a significant adverse increase in any environmental, social or economic impact of the facility or a change in the location of all or a portion of the facility unless the change in location was specifically approved by the council in the permit.

The council may waive the application and permit provisions of this chapter if the applicant establishes by clear and convincing proof that an emergency exists created by the loss or damage to an existing facility which seriously threatens the health, safety and welfare of the public.

The council may allow the permitting and reporting requirements of this act to be conducted electronically as provided by the Uniform Electronic Transaction Act, W.S.

40-21-101

through

40-21-119

.

For a permit issued for a facility meeting the definition of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), there shall be no vertical construction of a wind turbine within two (2) nautical miles of any active federal military missile launch or control facility, unless the owner or developer of the facility first obtains and furnishes documentation to the division of:

A written determination of no adverse impact on nuclear security operations from the military installation commander or the commander’s designee. The determination shall not be unreasonably withheld or denied;

A determination of no hazard from the federal aviation administration; and

Documentation from the federal military aviation and installation assurance siting clearinghouse that resolves any potential adverse impact on military operations and readiness and that commits to implement required mitigation measures.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.80; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 2005, ch. 30, § 1; 2010, ch. 47, § 1; ch. 97, § 2; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment

added (f).

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 47, § 5, in (c), substituted “impacted area” for “county”; and in (d), substituted “unless the change in location was specifically approved by the council in the permit” for “except as otherwise provided in the original application for alternate locations for the facility.”

The second 2010 amendment, by ch. 97, § 2, effective July 1, 2010, inserted “or pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

18-5-501

through

18-5-513

for facilities referred to the council” in (a).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (g).

Impact assistance funds paid from retroactive date of permit. —

When the industrial siting council grants a permit which is retroactively dated to the first day of construction, that construction should be held to have commenced “under a permit” and the state treasurer should pay impact assistance funds covering the entire period during which construction was “under a permit.” Evanston v. Griffith, 715 P.2d 1381,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 517

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 35-12-107.
Request for waiver of permit application; form.

Any person proposing to construct an industrial facility may submit a written request for a waiver of the application provisions of this chapter.

A request for a waiver shall be filed with the division, in a form as prescribed by council rules and regulations, and shall contain the following information:

The name and address of the applicant, and if the applicant is a partnership, association or corporation, the names and addresses of the managers designated by the applicant responsible for permitting or construction of the facility;

A description of the nature and location of the facility;

Estimated time of commencement of construction and construction time;

Estimated number and job classifications by calendar quarter of employees of the applicant, or contractor or subcontractor of the applicant, during the construction phase and during the operating phase;

Estimated population increases attributable to the facility;

Estimated additional revenue to local governments due to the facility;

Estimated construction cost of the facility;

A description of the methods and strategies the applicant will use to maximize the employment and utilization of the existing local or in-state contractors and labor force during the construction and operation of the facility;

Any other information the applicant considers relevant or required by council rule or regulation;

The procedures proposed to avoid constituting a public nuisance, endangering the public health and safety, human or animal life, property, wildlife or plant life, or recreational facilities which may be adversely affected by the facility;

Preliminary evaluations of or plans and proposals for alleviating social, economic or environmental impacts upon local government or any special districts which may result from the proposed facility, including voluntary company agreements with local governments;

Certification that the governing bodies of all local governments within the potentially impacted area were provided notification, a description of the proposed project and an opportunity to ask the applicant questions at least thirty (30) days prior to submission of the application;

For facilities permitted pursuant to W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), a site reclamation and decommissioning plan, which shall be updated every five (5) years and a description of a financial assurance plan which will assure that all facilities will be properly reclaimed and decommissioned. All such plans, unless otherwise exempt, shall demonstrate compliance with any rules or regulations adopted by the council pursuant to W.S. 35-12-105(d) and (e);

Information demonstrating the applicant’s financial capability to decommission and reclaim the facility. For facilities meeting the definition of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (G) the information shall also demonstrate the applicant’s financial capability to construct, maintain and operate the facility;

For proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), a list of all affected landowners with an address at which each affected landowner can be given the notices required by this act.

Not more than seven (7) days following receipt of a request for a waiver, the director shall:

Serve notice of the request upon the governing bodies of local governments which will be primarily affected by the proposed facility and, for proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), upon affected landowners;

Cause a summary of the request to be published in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be primarily affected by the proposed facility;

File a copy of the request with the county clerk of the county or counties in which the proposed facility will be constructed or which will be affected by the construction.

Not more than fourteen (14) days following receipt of a request, the director shall:

Schedule and conduct a public meeting;

Notify the applicant and local governments of the meeting and, for proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), notify affected landowners;

Cause notice of the meeting to be published in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be primarily affected by the proposed facility; and

Hold the meeting at a community as close as practicable to the proposed facility.

At the public meeting, the applicant shall present such information as necessary to describe the proposed facility and its estimated impacts upon local units of government.

Within fourteen (14) days of the public meeting, the applicant shall meet with the director and each local government affected by the proposed facility to determine the mitigation required to minimize any adverse impacts resulting from the proposed facility.

Not more than fifty (50) days following receipt of a request, the director shall:

Schedule and conduct a public hearing;

Notify the applicant and local governments of the hearing and, for proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G), notify affected landowners;

Cause notice of the hearing to be published in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation within the area to be primarily affected by the proposed facility; and

Hold the hearing at a community as close as practicable to the proposed facility.

The applicant shall present any evidence necessary to demonstrate to the council:

That the facility would not produce an unacceptable environmental, social or economic impact;

That the applicant has reached agreement with local governments affected by the facility on the mitigation required to alleviate adverse effects resulting from the facility; and

That the applicant has financial resources to decommission and reclaim the facility. For facilities meeting the definition of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (G) the evidence shall also demonstrate the applicant’s financial capability to construct, maintain and operate the facility.

Within ten (10) days from the date of completion of the hearing the council shall make complete findings, issue an opinion and render a decision upon the record, either granting or denying the request for a waiver. The council shall grant a request for a waiver either as proposed or as modified by the council if it finds and determines that:

The facility would not produce an unacceptable environmental, social and economic impact;

The applicant has discussed the proposed facility with all local governments potentially affected by the project;

The proposed facility is in compliance with all local ordinances and land use plans; and

The applicant has financial resources to decommission and reclaim the facility. For facilities meeting the definition of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (G) the council shall also be required to find the applicant has financial resources to construct, maintain and operate the facility.

No request for a waiver shall be granted if two (2) or more local governments which will be affected are not satisfied that the facility, considering the voluntary company agreements, represents an acceptable impact on the local governments.

If the council decides to waive all of the application requirements of this chapter, it shall issue a permit for the facility in accordance with W.S.

35-12-113

. If the council decides to waive a part of the application requirements of this chapter, it shall issue an order specifying the requirements which will not be required for an application filed pursuant to W.S.

35-12-109

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 166, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.80:2; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2010, ch. 47, §§ 1, 3; 2011, ch. 146, § 1; 2012, ch. 50, § 1; 2020 ch. 106, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “a description of the methods” for “a brief description of the methods” in (b)(viii); added (b)(xii) through (b)(xiv); added (h)(iii); added (j)(iv); and made related changes.

Laws 2010, ch. 47, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (b)(xv); and in (c)(i), (d)(ii) and (g)(ii), added “and, for proposed facilities meeting the requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (F), upon affected landowners” or variants.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, deleted “construct, maintain, operate” preceding “decommission” and added the second sentence in (b)(xiv), (h)(iii), and (j)(iv).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b)(xiii) through (b)(xv), (c)(i), (d)(ii), and (g)(ii) substituted “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E), (F) or (G)” for “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (F)”; and in (h)(iii) and (j)(iv) substituted “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (G)” for “W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-12-108.
Quantity of water available; analysis; public comment; opinions.

If an applicant applies for an industrial siting permit, pursuant to W.S.

35-12-106

, or for a waiver of the application provisions, pursuant to W.S.

35-12-107

, for a facility which requires the use of eight hundred (800) or more acre feet of the waters of this state annually, the applicant shall prepare and submit to the state engineer a water supply and water yield analysis with a request for a preliminary and final opinion as to the quantity of water available for the proposed facility.

Within ninety (90) days after the applicant has submitted an acceptable water supply and yield analysis, the state engineer, at the applicant’s expense, shall complete a comprehensive review of the water supply and water yield analysis submitted.

Within five (5) days after completion of the review, the state engineer shall render a preliminary opinion as to the quantity of water available for the proposed facility. The preliminary opinion, or a reasonable summary, shall be published for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proposed facility is to be located. The expense of the publication shall be borne by the applicant.

The state engineer may hold a public hearing before rendering a final opinion on the water supply and water yield analysis.

In rendering a final opinion as to the quantity of water available for the proposed facility, the state engineer shall consider any comments which are submitted in writing within twenty (20) days of the last date of publication.

Within thirty (30) days after the last date of publication, the state engineer shall render a final opinion. The final opinion shall:

Be submitted to the industrial siting council and the public service commission;

Be binding on the industrial siting council for the purposes of issuing an industrial siting permit; and

Be reviewed by the public service commission prior to its issuance of a certificate of public convenience and necessity.

The state engineer’s preliminary and final opinion shall not create a presumption concerning injury or noninjury to water rights, nor shall those opinions be used as evidence in any administrative proceeding or in any judicial proceeding concerning water right determinations or administration.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.81; W.S. 1977, §

35-12-107

; Laws 1987, ch. 82, § 2.